California, session 20252026, AB612.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14033.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:14033.5. On or before July 1, 2026, the department shall update the Highway Design Manual to direct local governments to consult with local fire departments when making road improvements to ensure the improvements do not negatively impact emergency response times. ___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________